Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 8.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 8.2. Any county in this state with a population of less
than five hundred fifty thousand (550,000) eight hundred seventy-
five thousand (875,000), according to the latest Federal Decennial
Census, which contains a metropolitan area municipality with a
population of two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) seven hundred
thousand (700,000) or more, according to the latest Federal
Decennial Census, may adopt or amend a County Home Rule Charter for
county government which specifies those powers appropriate for said
such government and which are not inconsistent with the Oklahoma
Constitution and laws of this state.
ENGR. S. B. NO. 1552 Page 1

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the Senate the 24th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives














ENGR. S. B. NO. 1552 Page 2